zh-TW: 變速箱冷卻器結構: 棒板式; 板翅式; 堆疊板式; 管片式; 其他
it: Costruzione del radiatore della trasmissione: A barre e piastre; A piastre e alette; A piastre sovrapposte; A tubi e alette; Altro
tr: Şanzıman soğutucu yapısı: Çubuk ve plaka; Plaka ve kanatçık; Katmanlı plaka; Boru ve kanatçık; Diğer
vi: Cấu trúc bộ làm mát hộp số: Thanh và tấm; Tấm và cánh tản nhiệt; Tấm xếp chồng; Ống và cánh tản nhiệt; Khác
fr: Construction du refroidisseur de transmission: Barres et plaques; Plaques et ailettes; Plaques empilées; Tubes et ailettes; Autre
pl: Konstrukcja chłodnicy skrzyni biegów: Płytowo-kanałowa; Płytowo-żebrowa; Wielopłytowa; Rurowo-żebrowa; Inne
sk-SK: Konštrukcia chladiča prevodovky: Tyčová a dosková; Dosková a rebrová; Skladané dosky; Trubková a rebrová; Iné
hr-HR: Konstrukcija hladnjaka mjenjača: Šipka i ploča; Ploča i rebro; Složene ploče; Cijev i rebro; Ostalo
nb: Konstruksjon av girkjøler: Bar-and-plate; Plate-and-fin; Stablede plater; Rør og lameller; Annet
lt-LT: Transmisijos aušintuvo konstrukcija: Strypų ir plokščių; Plokščių ir briaunų; Sukrautos plokštės; Vamzdžių ir briaunų; Kita
es: Construcción del enfriador de transmisión: Barra y placa; Placa y aleta; Placas apiladas; Tubo y aleta; Otra
cs: Konstrukce chladiče převodovky: Deskový (bar-and-plate); Lamelový (plate-and-fin); Skládaný deskový; Trubkový (tube-and-fin); Jiná
nl: Transmissiekoeler constructie: Staaf-en-plaat; Plaat-en-vin; Gestapelde plaat; Buis-en-vin; Overig
sv: Växellådskylarens konstruktion: Stång och platta; Platta och fläns; Staplad platta; Rör och fläns; Övrigt
ja: トランスミッションクーラー構造: バー＆プレート; プレート＆フィン; スタックトプレート; チューブ＆フィン; その他
sl-SI: Izdelava hladilnika menjalnika: Palica in plošča; Plošča in rebra; Zložene plošče; Cev in rebra; Drugo
pt-BR: Radiador de transmissão construção: Barras e placas; Placas e aletas; Placas sobrepostas; Tubos e aletas; Outro
el: Κατασκευή ψύκτη μετάδοσης: Ράβδου-πλάκας; Πλάκας-πτερυγίου; Στοιβαγμένων πλακών; Σωλήνα-πτερυγίου; Άλλο
ko: 변속기 냉각기 구조: 바 앤 플레이트; 플레이트 앤 핀; 스택 플레이트; 튜브 앤 핀; 기타
ro-RO: Construcția răcitorului de transmisie: Bară și placă; Placă și lamele; Plăci stivuite; Tub și lamele; Altele
th: โครงสร้างตัวระบายความร้อนเกียร์: บาร์และเพลต; เพลตและฟิน; เพลตซ้อนทับ; ท่อและฟิน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конструкция на охладител за трансмисия: С плочи и канали; Плочи и ламели; Наслоени плочи; Тръби и ламели; Друго
zh-CN: 变速箱冷却器结构: 条板式; 板翅式; 层叠板式; 管翅式; 其他
hu: Váltó hűtőjének felépítése: Rúd és lemez; Lemez és borda; Egymásra rakott lemezes; Cső és borda; Egyéb
fi: Vaihteiston jäähdyttimen rakenne: Tanko-levy-rakenne; Levy-lamelli-rakenne; Pinottu levy -rakenne; Putki-lamelli-rakenne; Muu
en: Transmission cooler construction: Bar-and-plate; Plate-and-fin; Stacked plate; Tube-and-fin; Other
da: Konstruktion af transmissionskøler: Stang og plade; Plade og finne; Stablet plade; Rør og finne; Andet
de: Bauart des Getriebekühlers: Bar-and-Plate; Plate-and-Fin; Gestapelte Platten; Tube-and-Fin; Sonstige
ru: Конструкция охладителя трансмиссии: Стержневой-пластинчатый; Пластинчато-ребристый; Многопластинчатый; Трубчато-ребристый; Другое
pt-PT: Construção do sistema de arrefecimento da transmissão: Barra e placa; Placa e aleta; Placas empilhadas; Tubo e aleta; Outro